Connecticut, session 2026, SB00343.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 29-11 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The bureau in the Division of State Police within the Department
of Emergency Services and Public Protection known as the State Police
Bureau of Identification shall be maintained for the purposes of: (1)
Providing an authentic record of each person sixteen years of age or over
who is charged with the commission of any crime involving moral
turpitude, (2) providing definite information relative to the identity of
each person so arrested, (3) providing a record of the final judgment of
the court resulting from such arrest, unless such record has been erased
pursuant to section 54-142a, and (4) maintaining a central repository of
complete criminal history record disposition information. The
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection is directed
to maintain the State Police Bureau of Identification, which bureau shall
SB343 / File No. 616 1

SB343 File No. 616
receive, classify and file in an orderly manner all fingerprints, pictures
and descriptions, including previous criminal records as far as known
of all persons so arrested, and shall classify and file in a like manner all
identification material and records received from the government of the
United States and from the various state governments and subdivisions
thereof, and shall cooperate with such governmental units in the
exchange of information relative to criminals. The State Police Bureau of
Identification shall accept fingerprints of applicants for admission to the
bar of the state and, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall
exchange state, multistate and federal criminal history records with the
State Bar Examining Committee for purposes of investigation of the
qualifications of any applicant for admission as an attorney under
section 51-80. The record of all arrests reported to the bureau after March
16, 1976, shall contain information of any disposition within ninety days
after the disposition has occurred.
(b) Any cost incurred by the State Police Bureau of Identification in
conducting any name search and fingerprinting of applicants for
admission to the bar of the state shall be paid from fees collected by the
State Bar Examining Committee.
(c) (1) (A) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
Protection shall charge the following fees for the service indicated: (i)
Name search, thirty-six dollars; (ii) fingerprint search, seventy-five
dollars; (iii) personal record search, seventy-five dollars; (iv) letters of
good conduct search, seventy-five dollars; (v) bar association search,
seventy-five dollars; (vi) fingerprinting, fifteen dollars; and (vii)
criminal history record information search, seventy-five dollars.
(B) [The] (i) Prior to July 1, 2029, the commissioner shall waive fees
imposed under subparagraph (A)(vii) of this subdivision for any
applicant requesting a criminal history record information search for the
purpose of applying for a pardon authorized pursuant to section 54-
124a. (ii) On and after July 1, 2029, the commissioner may waive fees
imposed under subparagraph (A)(vii) of this subdivision for any
applicant requesting a criminal history record information search for the
SB343 / File No. 616 2

SB343 File No. 616
purpose of applying for a pardon authorized pursuant to section 54-
124a, provided such applicant completes a form prescribed by the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection representing
such person's indigency.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the provisions
of this subsection shall not apply to any (A) federal, state or municipal
agency, (B) volunteer fire company or department, or (C) volunteer
ambulance service or company. The commissioner shall not require a
volunteer fire company or department or a volunteer ambulance service
or company to provide proof of insurance as a condition to receiving the
waiver of fees pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.
(d) (1) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
Protection may enter into one or more agreements with independent
contractors requiring such contractors to receive and transmit by
electronic means fingerprints and demographic information to the State
Police Bureau of Identification for the processing of criminal history
records checks. The commissioner shall require such contractors to
comply with terms and conditions as the commissioner shall prescribe
to protect and ensure the security, privacy, confidentiality and value of
the fingerprints and demographic information received and transmitted
by such contractors. [The] Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, the commissioner may authorize such contractors to charge
a convenience fee, which shall not exceed thirty dollars, for
fingerprinting.
(2) (A) Prior to July 1, 2029, no independent contractor may charge an
individual the convenience fee authorized under subdivision (1) of this
subsection when such individual requests receipt and transmission of
fingerprints and demographic information for the processing of a
criminal history records check for the purpose of applying for a pardon
authorized pursuant to section 54-124a.
(B) On and after July 1, 2029, no independent contractor may charge
an individual the convenience fee authorized under subdivision (1) of
this subsection when such individual (i) requests receipt and
SB343 / File No. 616 3

SB343 File No. 616
transmission of fingerprints and demographic information for the
processing of a criminal history records check for the purpose of
applying for a pardon authorized pursuant to section 54-124a, and (ii)
applies for a waiver of such fee due to indigency, on a form prescribed
by the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, and
the commissioner approves such waiver. When the commissioner
approves such a waiver, the commissioner shall pay such fee to such
contractor.
(e) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection
may adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54,
necessary to implement the provisions of the National Child Protection
Act of 1993, the Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of
1994, the Volunteers for Children Act of 1998, and the National Crime
Prevention and Privacy Compact as provided in section 29-164f to
provide for national criminal history records checks to determine an
employee's or volunteer's suitability and fitness to care for the safety
and well-being of children, the elderly and individuals with disabilities.
(f) (1) Prior to July 1, 2029, the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection shall not charge an individual any processing or
100 distribution fee for providing a criminal history report or any fee
101 associated with electronic preregistration with the Connecticut Criminal
102 History Request System when such individual is seeking such report or
103 such preregistration for the purpose of applying for a pardon
104 authorized pursuant to section 54-124a.
105 (2) On and after July 1, 2029, the Department of Emergency Services
106 and Public Protection shall not charge an individual any processing or
107 distribution fee for providing a criminal history report or any fee
108 associated with electronic preregistration with the Connecticut Criminal
109 History Request System when such individual (A) is seeking such report
110 or such preregistration for the purpose of applying for a pardon
111 authorized pursuant to section 54-124a, and (B) applies for a waiver of
112 any such fee due to indigency, on a form prescribed by the department,
113 and the commissioner approves such waiver.
SB343 / File No. 616 4

SB343 File No. 616
114 (g) Not later than July 1, 2029, the commissioner shall make the forms
115 described in subparagraph (B) of subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this
116 section, subparagraph (B) of subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of this
117 section and subdivision (2) of subsection (f) of this section available on
118 the Internet web site of the State Police Bureau of Identification and
119 provide such forms to each location where a municipal police
120 department provides fingerprinting services. Such forms shall be
121 prominently displayed at such locations, along with other materials and
122 documents necessary to complete an application for a pardon pursuant
123 to section 54-124a.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 29-11
JUD Joint Favorable
SB343 / File No. 616 5

SB343 File No. 616
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Department of Emergency GF - Revenue See Below See Below
Services and Public Protection Loss/ Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a General Fund (GF) revenue loss to the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection (DESPP) in FY
through FY 29 by requiring the agency to temporarily waive the $75
criminal history records fee and related pre-registration fees for anyone
applying for a pardon. (Under current law DESPP may waive the $75
fee only for indigent individuals.) Revenue loss from the bill would
depend on the additional waivers issued and number of people
applying for a pardon.1
The Out Years
Beginning in FY 30, the GF revenue impact is reduced by reverting
eligibility for the criminal history fee waiver back to only those who are
indigent. Also beginning in FY 30, there is a potential cost to DESPP by
requiring the agency to reimburse independent contractors for the $30
service fee they would otherwise charge for those who are indigent.
As a point of reference, the Connecticut Board of Pardons and Paroles reviewed 2,032
applications for pardon consideration in FY 25. It is unknown how many of those
applicants received the current indigency fee waiver. The potential maximum revenue
loss associated with this number of pardon requests is $152,400 ($75 x 2,032).
SB343 / File No. 616 6

SB343 File No. 616
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 343
AN ACT CONCERNING FEES CHARGED FOR CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECKS.